en: Hard-boiled egg
fr: Oeuf dur
hr: Tvrdo kuhano jaje
ja: 固茹で卵

en: Egg white cooked, cooked egg white
fr: blanc d'oeuf cuit
hr: Bjelanjak kuhan
lt: Keptas kiaušinio baltymas

en: Scotch eggs
de: Schottische Eier
es: Huevos a la escocesa
hr: Škotska jaja
ja: スコッチエッグ

en: Egg white
ca: Clares d'ou
de: Eiklar, Eiweiß
es: Claras de huevo, Clara de huevo
fr: Oeuf blanc, blanc d'oeuf
hr: Bjelanjak
ja: 卵白
lt: Kiaušinio baltymas
nl: Ei-eiwit

en: Egg powder
bg: Яйчен прах
fr: Oeuf en poudre
hr: Jaje u prahu
lt: Kiaušinių milteliai

en: Egg white powder
bg: Яйчен белтък на прах
fr: blanc d'oeuf en poudre
hr: Bjelanjak u prahu
lt: Kiaušinio baltymo milteliai

en: Egg yolk
bg: Яйчен жълтък
fr: Oeuf jaune, jaune d'oeuf, jaune d'oeuf liquide, Oeuf jaune liquide
hr: Žumanjak jajeta
ja: 卵黄
lt: Kiaušinio trynys

en: Egg yolk powder
bg: Яйчен жълтък на прах
fr: jaune d'oeuf en poudre
hr: Žumanjak u prahu
lt: Kiaušinio trynio milteliai

en: Century egg
fr: Oeuf de cent ans, Oeuf de 100 ans

en: Fats
bg: Мазнини
ca: Greixos
cs: Tuky
da: Fedt
de: Fette
es: Aceites y grasas, Grasas, Aceites
fi: rasvat
fr: Matières grasses, matière grasse
he: שומנים
hr: Masti
hu: Zsírok
it: Grassi
ja: 油脂
lt: Riebalai
nl: Vetten
pl: Tłuszcze
pt: Gorduras
ru: Жиры и масла, Масла и жиры, Масла, Масло
sv: Fett, Matfett
th: ไขมัน
tr: Yağ
zh: 脂肪

en: Animal fats
bg: Животински мазнини
ca: Greixos animals
de: Tierische Fette
es: Grasas animales, Grasas de origen animal, Aceites y grasas de origen animal
fi: eläinrasvat
fr: Matières grasses animales, matière grasse animale
he: שומן מן החי
hr: Životinjske masti
hu: Állati zsírok, Állati eredetű zsírok
it: Grassi animali
ja: 動物性油脂
lt: Gyvūniniai riebalai
nl: Dierlijke vetten
pl: Tłuszcze zwierzęce, Tłuscze zwierzęce
pt: Gorduras animais
ru: животные жиры, жиры животные
zh: 动物脂肪

en: Liquid margarines
es: Margarinas liquidas
fr: Margarines liquides
hr: Tekući margarini
lt: Skysti margarinai
nl: Vloeibare margarines
pl: Margaryny płynne

en: 50-63% blended fat with vegetable and animal origins
fr: Matière grasse mélangée végétale et laitière à 50-63% MG

en: 50-63% lightly salted blended fat with vegetable and animal origins
fr: Matière grasse mélangée végétale et laitière à 50-63% MG demi-sel

en: 30-40% blended fat with vegetable and animal origins
fr: Matière grasse mélangée végétale et laitière à tartiner à 30-40% MG

en: 30-40% lightly salted blended fat with vegetable and animal origins
fr: Matière grasse mélangée végétale et laitière à tartiner à 30-40% MG demi-sel

en: Dairy fat 25% fat light spreadable unsalted
fr: Matière grasse laitière à 25% MG légère à tartiner doux

en: Dairy fat 20% fat light spreadable unsalted
fr: Matière grasse laitière à 20% MG légère à tartiner doux

fr: Gras de bœuf, graisse de bœuf, suif de boeuf, blanc de bœuf, matière grasse de bœuf
nl: Rundvetten

en: Chicken fat
bg: Пилешка мазнина
fr: Graisse de poulet
hr: Pileća mast
lt: Vištienos taukai